Connecticut, session 2026, HB05090.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction for any compensation received by a
taxpayer for attending a funeral as a member of an honor guard detail
pursuant to section 27-76 of the general statutes.